Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.580

Phone interpretation services—Posting vendor information on website.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the office of the education ombuds shall post information on the agency's website regarding the phone interpretation vendors on contract with the state of Washington, including contact information.

(2) School districts are encouraged to use the phone interpretation services addressed in subsection (1) of this section to communicate with student's parents, legal guardians, and family members who have limited English proficiency.

[ 2014 c 150 s 4.]